Washington statutes.
RCW 19.100.252

Denial, suspension, or revocation of franchise broker by director.

The director may by order deny, suspend, or revoke registration of any franchise broker if the director finds that the order is in the public interest and that the applicant or registrant, or any partner, officer, or director of the applicant or registrant:

(1) Has filed an application for registration as a franchise broker under RCW 19.100.140 which, as of its effective date, or as of any date after filing in the case of an order denying effectiveness, was incomplete in any material respect or contained any statement which was, in the light of the circumstances under which it was made, false or misleading with respect to any material fact;

(2) Has willfully violated or willfully failed to comply with any provision of this chapter;

(3) Has been convicted, within the past five years of any misdemeanor involving a franchise, or any felony involving moral turpitude;

(4) Is permanently or temporarily enjoined by any court of competent jurisdiction from engaging in or continuing any aspect of the franchise industry;

(5) Is the subject of an order of the director denying, suspending, or revoking registration as a franchise broker;

(6) Has engaged in dishonest or unethical practices in the franchise industry;

(7) Is insolvent, either in the sense that his or her liabilities exceed his or her assets or in the sense that he or she cannot meet his or her obligations as they mature.

The director may by order summarily postpone or suspend registration pending final determination of any proceeding under this section.

[ 1991 c 226 s 16.]